apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<pardef n="h/ov__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ovene</l>     <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>øvene</l>     <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>over</l>      <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>øver</l>      <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oven</l>      <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ov</l>        <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ovene</l>     <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ov</l>        <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ovet</l>      <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ov</l>        <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ova</l>       <r>ov<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="br/ok__n">
  <e>       <p><l>økene</l>     <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øker</l>      <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oka</l>       <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ok</l>        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>økene</l>     <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øker</l>      <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oken</l>      <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ok</l>        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lev/er__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erne</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erer</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ere</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eren</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/ås__n">
  <!-- wsd todo -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>æsene</l>     <r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åsene</l>     <r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>æser</l>      <r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åser</l>      <r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åsen</l>      <r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_'__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sefardi__n">
  <e>       <p><l>mene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>m</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hiv__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="data__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="data">            <i>data</i><par n="data__n"/></e>
<e lm="lever">           <i>lev</i><par n="lev/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="ordbok"><i>ordb</i><par n="br/ok__n"/></e>
    <e lm="salmebok"><i>salmeb</i><par n="br/ok__n"/></e>
